Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2799.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1122, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1122. Duties of registrar; qualifications for license; training; examination; fingerprinting; definition A. A contractor's license may be issued only by act of the registrar of contractors. The registrar shall: 1. Classify and qualify applicants for a license. 2. If necessary, change the license classification of a licensee in the case of a title reclassification, with or without a bond rider for the purpose of continuing liability on the bond. 3. Conduct investigations the registrar deems necessary. 4. Establish written examinations to protect the health and safety of the public. B. To obtain, renew or maintain a license under this chapter, the applicant or licensee shall: 1. Submit to the registrar of contractors a verified application on forms that are prescribed by the registrar of contractors and that contain the following information: (a) A designation of the classification of license that is sought by the applicant. (b) If the applicant is a sole proprietorship, the applicant's name and address. (c) If the applicant is a partnership, the names and addresses of all partners with a designation of any limited partners. (d) If the applicant is a limited liability company, the names and addresses of all of the following, as applicable: (i) If the applicant is a manager-managed limited liability company, all managers. (ii) If the applicant is a member-managed limited liability company, all members. (iii) All owners of twenty-five percent or more of the stock or beneficial interest. (e) If the applicant is a corporation, an association or any other organization, the names and addresses of all of the following: (i) The president, vice president, secretary and treasurer or the names and addresses of the functional equivalent of all of these officers. (ii) The directors. (iii) The owners of twenty-five percent or more of the stock or beneficial interest. (f) The name and address of the qualifying party. (g) If the applicant is a limited liability company or corporation, an attestation that the limited liability company or corporation is in good standing with the corporation commission. (h) The address or location of the applicant's place of business and the mailing address if it is different from the applicant's place of business. (i) An attestation that the applicant has complied with the statutes and rules governing workers' compensation insurance. If the applicant is required by law to secure workers' compensation insurance pursuant to title 23, chapter 6, the attestation must contain the workers' compensation insurance policy number or be accompanied by proof of self-insurance. (j) If the applicant is a trust, the names and addresses of all trustees. 2. Submit the appropriate fee required under this chapter. 3. Submit and maintain the appropriate bond required under this chapter. 4. Notify the registrar of any change in the information required by this section within thirty days after the change occurs. C. To obtain, renew or maintain a license under this chapter, each person who is named on a license must not have engaged in contracting without a license or committed any act that, if committed or done by any licensed contractor, would be grounds for suspension or revocation of a contractor's license or be named on a license that was suspended or revoked in this state or another state. D. Any licensee whose scope of work may include excavation as determined by the registrar shall ensure that the competent person and any employee who is EXPECTED to enter a trench is properly trained in trench safety. The competent person and each employee prescribed in this subsection shall renew trench SAFETY training every two years or on renewal of the license. D. e. To obtain a license under this chapter, a person may not have had a license denied, refused or revoked within one year before the person's application. The registrar may find circumstances behind the denial, refusal or revocation excusable if the applicant's actions did not result in an unremedied hardship or danger or loss to the public. A person who has been convicted of contracting without a license is not eligible to obtain a license under this chapter for one year after the date of the last conviction. E. f. Before a license is issued, the qualifying party must: 1. Have a minimum of four years' practical or management trade experience, at least two of which must have been within the last ten years, dealing specifically with the type of construction, or its equivalent, for which the applicant is applying for a license. Technical training in an accredited college or university or in a manufacturer's accredited training program may be substituted for a portion of such experience, but in no case may credited technical training exceed two years of the required four years' experience. The registrar of contractors may reduce the four years' practical or management experience requirement if in the registrar's opinion it has been conclusively shown by custom and usage in the particular industry or craft involved that the four-year requirement is excessive. The registrar shall waive the work experience documentation and verification if the records reflect that the qualifying party is currently or has previously been a qualifying party for a licensee in this state in the same classification and meets all other qualifications. 2. Successfully show, by written examination taken not more than two years before application, if required, qualification in the kind of work for which the applicant proposes to contract, the applicant's general knowledge of the building, safety, health and lien laws of the state, administrative principles of the contracting business and the rules adopted by the registrar of contractors pursuant to this chapter, demonstrate knowledge and understanding of construction plans and specifications applicable to the particular industry or craft and of the standards of construction work and techniques and practices in the particular industry or craft and demonstrate a general understanding of other related construction trades, in addition to any other matters as may be deemed appropriate by the registrar to determine that the qualifying party meets the requirements of this chapter. 3. SUCCESSFULLY show participation in a division of occupational safety and health-approved trench safety training course. F. g. The registrar shall maintain multiple versions of examinations for each type of license that requires an examination. The registrar shall waive the examination requirement if the records reflect that the qualifying party is currently or has previously been a qualifying party for a licensee in this state in the same classification within the preceding five years. G. h. A license may not be issued to a minor, to any partnership in which one of the partners is a minor or to any corporation in which a corporate officer is a minor. H. I. Before receiving, renewing and holding a license pursuant to this chapter, the registrar may require a license applicant or licensee to submit to the registrar a full set of fingerprints and the fees required in section 41-1750. The registrar shall submit the fingerprints and fees to the department of public safety for the purpose of obtaining a state and federal criminal records check pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544.  The department of public safety may exchange this fingerprint data with the federal bureau of investigation. j. for the purposes of this section, "competent person" means an individual who is knowledgeable about excavation standards and able to identify hazards and who has the authority to take immediate corrective action. END_STATUTE